apertium-sqi.sqi.dix
    <pardef n="/vij__vblex" c="Class Irregular">
      <e><p><l>vij</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vjen</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vjen</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vijmë</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vini</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vijnë</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>erdha</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erdhe</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erdhi</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erdhëm</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erdhët</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erdhën</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>vija</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vije</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vinte</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vinim</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vinit</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vinin</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>vihem</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vihe</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vihet</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vihemi</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>viheti</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vihen</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>erdha</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erdhe</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erdh</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erdhëm</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erdhët</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erdhën</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>vihesha</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>viheshe</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vihej</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>viheshim</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>viheshit</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>viheshin</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>vij</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vijsh</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vijë</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vijmë</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vini</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vijnë</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ardhsha</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ardhsh</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ardhë</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ardhshim</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ardhshit</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ardhshin</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ardhkam</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ardhke</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ardhka</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ardhkemi</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ardhkeni</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ardhkan</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ardhkësha</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ardhkëshe</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ardhkësh</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ardhkëshim</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ardhkëshit</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ardhkëshin</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>eja</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ejani</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ardhur</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ardhur</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ardhuri</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ardhuri</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ardhuri</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ardhurit</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ardhurit</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ardhurit</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ardhurit</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ardhurit</l><r>vij<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>























  </pardefs>

    <e lm="vij"><i></i><par n="/vij__vblex"/></e>
